New York, session 2025-2026, A8777.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 339 of the laws of 2023 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing an occupancy tax in the town of Putnam 3 Valley, in Putnam county, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed [2] 4 years after such date. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13288-01-5